South Dakota, session 2026, HB1006.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is established the Indian Medicaid Managed Care Model taskforce to study
the creation of Indian medicaid managed care entities, as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 1396u-2(h),
in this state. The taskforce must consist of:
(1) A representative from each federally recognized Indian tribe located wholly or
partially within the state, appointed by the appropriate tribal council;
(2) The secretary of the Department of Social Services, or the secretary's designee;
(3) The secretary of the Department of Health, or the secretary's designee;
(4) The secretary of the Department of Tribal Relations, or the secretary's designee;
(5) Two members of the House of Representatives, appointed by the speaker of the
House of Representatives;
(6) Two members of the Senate, appointed by the president pro tempore of the
Senate;
(7) A representative of the United States Bureau of Indian Affairs, appointed by the
director of the bureau; and
(8) The following members, appointed by the Executive Board of the Legislative
Research Council:
(a) One member representing a healthcare provider;
(b) One member representing a healthcare insurance provider; and
(c) One healthcare administrator.
Any vacancy on the taskforce must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment.
At the initial meeting, the members of the taskforce shall select one from among
themselves to serve as the chair and one to serve as the vice chair.

26.215.21 2 1006
The Department of Social Services shall provide administrative support to the
taskforce.
The taskforce shall seek input from state and federal executive branch agencies,
representatives of the Indian tribes, representatives of the health care industry, and other
relevant stakeholders.
The taskforce shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any
proposed legislation, to the Governor, on or before December 1, 2028.
HB1006 ENROLLED

26.215.21 3 1006
An Act to create a taskforce to study the creation of Indian medicaid managed care entities
in the state.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1006
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1006 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1006 ENROLLED